Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2316.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Official State Migratory Bird Act.Section 2. Legislative findings.The General Assembly finds that:(1) The Scarlet Tanager (Piranga olivacea) is a strikingly beautiful songbird, known for the male's scarlet red and black feathers, that migrates annually between this Commonwealth and its wintering grounds in Central and South America.(2) This Commonwealth provides critical breeding and migratory stopover habitat for the Scarlet Tanager during its annual life cycle, particularly in this Commonwealth's mature oak forests. These hardwood forests provide an abundant 123456789101112131415161718 supply of insects for food, which are essential for nesting, feeding and resting as the species travels thousands of miles between continents.(3) This Commonwealth supports 17% of the global Scarlet Tanager population during the breeding season, the highest percentage of any state.(4) Scarlet Tanagers have a special connection to the landscapes that give this Commonwealth its unique identity and heritage, including the Laurel Highlands in the west, the Pocono Mountains to the east, the Pennsylvania Wilds in the north, the Susquehanna Valley in central Pennsylvania and occasionally in busier, urban areas.(5) The Scarlet Tanager is an indicator species, meaning its presence reflects the health of this Commonwealth's diverse natural ecosystems, and protecting its habitat benefits not only the Scarlet Tanager but also a diverse array of wildlife, including other migratory birds, amphibians, fish and invertebrates that rely on these environments.(6) Conserving and sustainably managing the mature forests of this Commonwealth not only supports the Scarlet Tanager, but also supports this Commonwealth's wood products industry and diverse forest products economy.(7) This Commonwealth's natural resources, including its rivers, forests, wetlands, mountains and urban parks, are vital to this Commonwealth's economy, culture and biodiversity, and recognizing the Scarlet Tanager as the official State migratory bird will underscore the Commonwealth's commitment to conservation, ecotourism and the protection of its natural and cultural heritage.20260HB2316PN3073 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (8) Promoting awareness of the Scarlet Tanager and its habitat needs will help encourage responsible healthy forest management and a robust forest product economy, ensuring that this Commonwealth's rich environmental legacy is preserved for future generations.Section 3. Official State migratory bird.The Scarlet Tanager (Piranga olivacea) is selected, designated and adopted as the official migratory bird of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.Section 4. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2316PN3073 - 3 - 1234567891011